Florida, session 2026, SB754.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 210.01, Florida 22 Statutes, is amended to read: 23 210.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this part the following 24 words shall have the meaning herein indicated: 25 (1)ââCigaretteâ means any roll for smoking, except one of 26 which the tobacco is fully naturally fermented, without regard 27 to the kind of tobacco or other substances used in the inner 28 roll or the nature or composition of the material in which the 29 roll is wrapped, which is made wholly or in part of tobacco 30 irrespective of size or shape and whether such tobacco is 31 flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other ingredient. The 32 term does not include a heated tobacco product as defined by s. 33 210.25. 34 Section 2.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 35 210.095, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 36 210.095âMail order, Internet, and remote sales of tobacco 37 products; age verification.â 38 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 39 (i)ââTobacco productsâ means all cigarettes, smoking 40 tobacco, snuff, fine-cut chewing tobacco, cut and granulated 41 tobacco, cavendish, and plug or twist tobacco, and heated 42 tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25. 43 Section 3.âPart II of chapter 210, Florida Statutes, 44 entitled âTax on Tobacco Products other than Cigarettes or 45 Cigars,â is renamed âTax on Tobacco Products other than 46 Cigarettes, Heated Tobacco Products, or Cigars.â 47 Section 4.âPresent subsections (6) through (14) of section 48 210.25, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 49 through (15), respectively, a new subsection (6) is added to 50 that section, and present subsection (12) of that section is 51 amended, to read: 52 210.25âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 53 (6)ââHeated tobacco productâ means a product containing 54 tobacco designed for use in an electronic device with a heat 55 source that does not involve any form of burning or combustion 56 during ordinary conditions of use and which produces an 57 inhalable aerosol by heating the tobacco but does not produce 58 any smoke. 59 (13)(12)ââTobacco productsâ means loose tobacco suitable 60 for smoking; snuff; snuff flour; cavendish; plug and twist 61 tobacco; fine cuts and other chewing tobaccos; shorts; refuse 62 scraps; clippings, cuttings, and sweepings of tobacco, and other 63 kinds and forms of tobacco prepared in such manner as to be 64 suitable for chewing; but âtobacco productsâ does not include 65 cigarettes, as defined by s. 210.01(1), heated tobacco products, 66 or cigars. 67 Section 5.âSubsection (8) of section 569.002, Florida 68 Statutes, is amended to read: 69 569.002âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 70 (8)ââTobacco productsâ includes loose tobacco leaves, and 71 products made from tobacco leaves, in whole or in part, and 72 cigarette wrappers, which can be used for smoking, sniffing, or 73 chewing, and heated tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25. 74 Section 6.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 75 951.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 76 951.22âCounty detention facilities; contraband articles.â 77 (1)âIt is unlawful, except through regular channels as duly 78 authorized by the sheriff or officer in charge, to introduce 79 into or possess upon the grounds of any county detention 80 facility as defined in s. 951.23 or to give to or receive from 81 any inmate of any such facility wherever said inmate is located 82 at the time or to take or to attempt to take or send therefrom 83 any of the following articles, which are contraband: 84 (d)âAny tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25 s. 85 210.25(12). 86 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 87 made by this act to section 569.002, Florida Statutes, in a 88 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 569.31, Florida 89 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 90 569.31âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 91 (5)ââNicotine productâ means any product that contains 92 nicotine, including liquid nicotine, which is intended for human 93 consumption, whether inhaled, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or 94 ingested by any means. The term also includes any nicotine 95 dispensing device. The term does not include a: 96 (a)âTobacco product, as defined in s. 569.002; 97 (b)âProduct regulated as a drug or device by the United 98 States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the 99 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or 100 (c)âProduct that contains incidental nicotine. 101 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.